Utah statutes.
53A-11-101.3.   Preapproval of extended absence.

In determining whether to preapprove an extended absence of a school-age minor as a valid excuse under Subsection 53A-11-101(9)(e), a local school board, local charter board, or school district shall approve the absence if the local school board, local charter board, or school district determines that the extended absence will not adversely impact the school-age minor's education.

